Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. Effective July 1, 2026, the compensation paid to each
employee of the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department shall be
increased as follows:
1. Seven percent (7%) for employees with an annual salary of
less than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00);
2. Five percent (5%) for employees with an annual salary equal
to or greater than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) but less than
Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00); and

Req. No. 15977 Page 1

3. Three percent (3%) for employees with an annual salary equal
to or greater than Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) but less than
One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).
B. Employees with an annual salary equal to or greater than One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall not receive an increase
pursuant to this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, resources, health or safety, an emergency is
hereby declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take
effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15977 TKR 01/29/26











Req. No. 15977 Page 2